Arkansas, session 2025, HB1180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-202(f)(46) and (47), concerning the
laws for which public school superintendents may be required to submit a
written statement of assurance that ensures compliance, is amended to read as
follows:
(46) Section 6-17-2803(7) and rules promulgated by the state
board concerning the required training and credentialing of evaluators under
the Teacher Excellence and Support System, § 6-17-2801 et seq.; and
(47) Section 6-16-1008 and § 6-18-703(a)(3)(A)(ii) concerning
requirements for certain human fetal growth and development education; and
(47)(48) Any other statutory mandate for school districts
identified by the division as relevant to the Standards for Accreditation of
Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-1008. Human fetal growth and development education.
(a) As used in this section, "human fetal growth and development
*TNL059*
02-19-2025 11:36:53 TNL059

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/5/25 S2/18/25 S2/19/25 HB1180
discussion" means an oral, written, or digital lesson, lecture, or
presentation regarding human biology as it relates to pregnancy and human
development inside the womb.
(b)(1) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall incorporate a human fetal growth and development discussion into
an existing health and safety course beginning in the sixth grade.
(2)(A) The human fetal growth and development discussion
required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include:
(i) A high-definition ultrasound video that shows
the brain, heart, sex organs, and other vital organs in early fetal
development; and
(ii) A video that is at least three (3) minutes in
duration that depicts the process of fertilization and every stage of human
development inside the uterus and notes significant markers in cell growth
and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until birth.
(B) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall promulgate a rule for a list of approved videos under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section, including without limitation the "Meet Baby
Olivia" video developed by Live Action, as it existed on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-703(a), concerning the establishment
of school-based health clinics by school districts, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A)(i) No school-based health clinic may be established in a
public school until requested by resolution by the school district board of
directors, and no child shall receive school-based health clinic services
without parental consent.
(ii) Parental consent to contraceptive services and
condom distribution shall be specific, in writing, and maintained in the
student's health records.
(B)(i) All school-based clinics shall maintain accurate
records of the distributing and prescribing of contraceptives and condoms.
(ii) The number of pregnancies and sexually
transmitted diseases among students in the schools with school-based clinics
shall be transmitted annually to the school district board of directors.
(iii) Records maintained under this section are part
02-19-2025 11:36:53 TNL059

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/5/25 S2/18/25 S2/19/25 HB1180
of the confidential medical record of the student.
(iv) Numerical or statistical data required to be
maintained under this subsection may not be released in a manner that reveals
the identity of or any other information contained in the file of the
student.
(2) If the board of directors establishes a school-based health
clinic, the board of directors shall retain absolute control over the
operations and programs offered by the clinic.
(3)(A) Schools that offer sex education in school-based health
clinics shall include instruction:
(i) Instruction in sexual abstinence,; and no funds
(ii) A human fetal growth and development
discussion, as defined in § 6-16-1008(a), which shall include:
(a) A high-definition ultrasound video that is
at least three (3) minutes in duration depicting the brain, heart, sex
organs, and other vital organs in early fetal development; and
(b) The "Meet Baby Olivia" video developed by
Live Action, which depicts the process of fertilization and every stage of
human development inside the uterus and notes significant markers in cell
growth and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until
birth.
(B) Funds shall not be utilized for abortion referral.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Baby Olivia Act".

/s/Bentley









02-19-2025 11:36:53 TNL059